src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-4lex_mustottem_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - muštottem: # MLO checked
    muštottem+A+Attr: [muštottes, muštottemes, muštottis]
    muštottem+A+Sg+Nom: muštottem
    muštottem+A+Sg+Gen: muštotteme
    muštottem+A+Sg+Acc: muštotteme
    muštottem+A+Sg+Ill: muštottiämán
    muštottem+A+Sg+Loc: muštotteemeest
    muštottem+A+Sg+Com: muštottemáin
    muštottem+A+Sg+Abe: muštottemttáá
    muštottem+A+Ess: muštottemmin
    muštottem+A+Pl+Nom: muštottemeh
    muštottem+A+Pl+Gen: muštottemij
    muštottem+A+Pl+Acc: muštottemijd
    muštottem+A+Pl+Ill: muštottemáid
    muštottem+A+Pl+Loc: muštottemijn
    muštottem+A+Pl+Com: [muštottemijguin, muštottemijgijn]
    muštottem+A+Pl+Abe: muštottemijttáá
